Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-282
Issuance of registration.

(a) If the Secretary of State finds that an application for registration conforms to law and all requisite fees have been paid, he or she shall:

(1) Endorse on the application the word Filed, and the month, day, and year of the filing thereof;

(2) File in his or her office a duplicate original of the application; and

(3) Issue a certificate of registration to transact business in this state.

(b) The certificate of registration, together with a duplicate original of the application, shall be returned to the person who filed the application or his or her representative.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 50.